Illinois, session 104th, HB3450.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Naturopathic Medical Practice Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose and findings. The practice of 7naturopathic medicine in the State is declared to affect the 8public health, safety, and welfare and to be subject to 9regulation and control in the public interest. It is further 10declared to be a matter of public interest that naturopathic 11doctors and the practice of naturopathic medicine, as defined 12in this Act, merit the confidence of the public, that only 13qualified persons be authorized to practice naturopathic 14medicine in the State, and that no person shall practice 15naturopathic medicine without a valid existing license to do 16so. 17    The State is facing an unprecedented primary care shortage 18in urban counties and an even higher shortage in rural 19counties. Naturopathic doctors with a proper scope of practice 20can help fill this void. 21    The General Assembly recognizes that naturopathic doctors 22comprise a distinct health care profession that affects the 23public health, safety, and welfare and that licensure of   HB3450- 2 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1naturopathic doctors will increase freedom of choice in health 2care and help address the primary care shortage in the State. 3This Act shall be liberally construed to best carry out these 4subjects and purposes.  5    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act: 6    "Approved naturopathic medical educational program" means 7an educational program that the Board has approved as meeting 8the requirements of Section 20 of this Act and that prepares 9naturopathic doctors for the practice of naturopathic 10medicine. 11    "Association" means an entity that is approved by the 12American Association of Naturopathic Physicians and that 13represents the interests of naturopathic doctors in this 14State. 15    "Board" means the Naturopathic Medical Board established 16under Section 80 of this Act. 17    "Clinical laboratory procedure" means the use of 18venipuncture consistent with naturopathic medical practice, 19commonly used diagnostic modalities consistent with 20naturopathic practice, the recording of a patient's health 21history, physical examination, ordering and interpretation of 22radiographic diagnostics, and other standard imaging and 23examination of body orifices, excluding endoscopy and 24colonoscopy. "Clinical laboratory procedure" includes the 25practice of obtaining samples of human tissues, except   HB3450- 3 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1surgical excision beyond surgical excision that is authorized 2as a minor office procedure.3    "Department" mean the Department of Financial and 4Professional Regulation.5    "Homeopathic medicine" means a system of medicine based on 6the use of infinitesimal doses of substances capable of 7producing symptoms similar to those of the disease treated, as 8listed in the Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States. 9    "Hygiene" means the use of preventive techniques, 10including personal hygiene for asepsis, public health, and 11safety. 12    "Laboratory examination" means: 13        (1) phlebotomy; 14        (2) a clinical laboratory procedure; 15        (3) an orificial examination; 16        (4) a physiological function test; and 17        (5) a screening or test that is consistent with 18    naturopathic education and training. 19    "Legend drug" has the same meaning as set forth in Section 203.23 of the Illinois Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act. 21    "License" means a license issued by the Board to an 22individual pursuant to this Act and rules authorizing that 23individual to practice naturopathic medicine in this State. 24    "Licensee" means a naturopathic doctor licensed by the 25Board to practice naturopathic medicine in this State. 26    "Minor office procedure" includes:   HB3450- 4 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1        (1) the treatment of superficial lacerations, lesions, 2    or abrasions, excluding surgical care to treat a lesion 3    suspected of malignancy; 4        (2) the removal of foreign bodies located in 5    superficial structures, excluding the globe of the eye;6        (3) trigger point therapy; 7        (4) dermal stimulation; and8        (5) the use of antiseptics and topical or local 9    anesthetics. 10    "Naturopathic doctor" means an individual licensed under 11this Act as a naturopathic doctor to practice naturopathic 12medicine in this State as a primary care provider.13    "Naturopathic medicine" means: 14        (1) a system of health care for the prevention, 15    diagnosis, and treatment of human health conditions, 16    injury, and disease; 17        (2) the promotion or restoration of health; and 18        (3) the support and stimulation of a patient's 19    inherent self-healing processes through patient education 20    and the use of naturopathic therapies and therapeutic 21    substances. 22    "Naturopathic physical medicine" means the use of one or 23more of the following physical agents in a manner consistent 24with naturopathic medical practice on a part or the whole of 25the body, by hand or by mechanical means, in the resolution of 26a human ailment or conditions:   HB3450- 5 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1        (1) air; 2        (2) water; 3        (3) heat; 4        (4) cold; 5        (5) sound; 6        (6) light; 7        (7) electromagnetism; 8        (8) soft tissue therapy; 9        (9) joint mobilization; 10        (10) therapeutic exercise; or 11        (11) naturopathic manipulation. 12    "Naturopathic therapy" means the use of: 13        (1) naturopathic physical medicine; 14        (2) suggestion; 15        (3) hygiene; 16        (4) a therapeutic substance; 17        (5) nutrition and food science; 18        (6) homeopathic medicine; 19        (7) a clinical laboratory procedure; or 20        (8) a minor office procedure. 21    "Nutrition and food science" means the prevention and 22treatment of disease or other human conditions through the use 23of food, water, herbs, roots, bark, or natural food elements. 24    "Prescription" has the same meaning as set forth in 25Section 3 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 26    "Professional examination" means a competency based   HB3450- 6 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1naturopathic doctor licensing examination as determined by 2Department rule.3    "Suggestion" means a technique using: 4        (1) biofeedback; 5        (2) health education; or 6        (3) health counseling. 7    "Telehealth" or "telepractice" means the delivery of 8services under this Act by using electronic communication, 9information technologies, or other means between an individual 10licensed under this Act in one location and a patient or client 11in another location, with or without an intervening healthcare 12provider. "Telehealth" or "telepractice" includes direct, 13interactive patient encounters, asynchronous 14store-and-forward technologies, and remote monitoring. 15Telehealth or telepractice is not prohibited under this Act if 16the provision of telehealth or telepractice services is 17appropriate for the client and the level of care provided 18meets the required level of care for that client. Individuals 19providing services regulated by this Act via telepractice 20shall comply with and are subject to all licensing and 21disciplinary provisions of this Act.22    "Therapeutic substance" means any of the following 23exemplified in a standard naturopathic medical text, journal, 24or pharmacopoeia: 25        (1) a vitamin; 26        (2) a mineral;   HB3450- 7 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1        (3) a nutraceutical; 2        (4) a botanical medicine; 3        (5) oxygen; 4        (6) a homeopathic medicine; 5        (7) a hormone; 6        (8) a hormonal or pharmaceutical contraceptive device;7        (9) an enzyme; or8        (10) other physiologic substance. 9    Section 15. Qualifications for licensure. The Board shall 10license an applicant who: 11        (1) submits, in accordance with rules of the 12    Department, the following items to the Board: 13            (A) an application for licensure designed and 14        approved by the Board and submitted in accordance with 15        rules of the Department; 16            (B) an application fee submitted in an amount and 17        manner established by rules of the Department; 18            (C) evidence that the applicant has graduated from 19        a Council on Naturopathic Medical Education or an 20        equivalent federally recognized accrediting body, 21        approved naturopathic medical education program; 22            (D) evidence that the applicant has passed a 23        professional examination authorized by rule of the 24        Department and administered by the North American 25        Board of Naturopathic Examiners or its successor;   HB3450- 8 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1            (E) evidence that the applicant has passed a minor 2        surgery examination authorized by rules of the 3        Department and administered by the North American 4        Board of Naturopathic Examiners or its successor; and5            (F) evidence that the applicant has passed a 6        jurisprudence examination conducted by the 7        Naturopathic Medical Board; 8        (2) is determined by the Board to be physically and 9    mentally capable of safely practicing naturopathic 10    medicine with or without reasonable accommodation; and 11        (3) has not had a license to practice naturopathic 12    medicine or other health care license, registration, or 13    certificate refused, revoked, or suspended by any other 14    jurisdiction for reasons that relate to the applicant's 15    ability to skillfully and safely practice naturopathic 16    medicine unless that license, registration, or 17    certification has been restored to good standing by that 18    jurisdiction.  19    Section 20. Approved naturopathic medical educational 20program. The Department shall establish, by rule, guidelines 21for an approved naturopathic medical educational program, 22which guidelines shall meet the following requirements and the 23Department's specifications for the education of naturopathic 24doctors. The approved naturopathic medical educational program 25shall:   HB3450- 9 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1        (1) offer graduate-level, full-time didactic and 2    supervised clinical training; 3        (2) be accredited, or have achieved candidacy status 4    for accreditation, by the Council on Naturopathic Medical 5    Education or an equivalent federally recognized 6    accrediting body for naturopathic medical programs that is 7    also recognized by the Department; and 8        (3) be conducted by an institution of higher 9    education, or a division of an institution of higher 10    education, that: 11            (A) is accredited or is a candidate for 12        accreditation by a regional or national institutional 13        accrediting agency recognized by the United States 14        Secretary of Education or a diploma-granting, 15        degree-equivalent college or university; or 16            (B) meets equivalent standards for recognition of 17        accreditation established by rules of the Department 18        for medical education programs offered in Canada.  19    Section 25. Display of license. A licensee shall display 20the licensee's license in the licensee's place of business in 21a location clearly visible to the licensee's patients and 22shall also display evidence of the licensee having completed 23an approved naturopathic medical educational program. 24    Section 30. Written collaborative agreements; prescriptive   HB3450- 10 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1authority. 2    (a) A written collaborative agreement is required for all 3naturopathic doctors to practice in the State, except as 4provided in Section 35 and Section 40.5    (b) A written collaborative agreement shall describe the 6working relationship of the naturopathic doctor with the 7collaborating physician and shall describe the categories of 8care, treatment, or procedures to be provided by the 9naturopathic doctor. The written collaborative agreement shall 10promote the exercise of professional judgment by the 11naturopathic doctor commensurate with his or her education, 12training and experience. The services to be provided by the 13naturopathic doctor shall be services that the collaborating 14physician is authorized to and generally provides to his or 15her patients in the normal course of his or her clinical 16medical practice. The written collaborative agreement need not 17describe the exact steps that a naturopathic doctor must take 18with respect to each specific condition, disease, or symptom 19but must specify which authorized procedures require the 20presence of the collaborating physician as the procedures are 21being performed. The relationship under a written 22collaborative agreement shall not be construed to require the 23personal presence of a physician at the place where services 24are rendered. Methods of communication shall be available for 25consultation with the collaborating physician in person or by 26telecommunications or electronic communications as set forth   HB3450- 11 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1in the written collaborative agreement. For the purposes of 2this Section, "generally provides to his or her patients in 3the normal course of his or her clinical medical practice" 4means services, not specific tasks or duties, the 5collaborating physician routinely provides individually or 6through delegation to other persons so that the physician has 7the experience and ability to collaborate and provide 8consultation.9    (c) The written collaborative agreement shall be adequate 10if a physician:11        (1) participates in the joint formulation and joint 12    approval of orders or guidelines with the naturopathic 13    doctor and he or she periodically reviews such orders and 14    the services provided patients under such orders in 15    accordance with accepted standards of medical practice and 16    naturopathic doctor practice; and 17        (2) provides consultation at least once a month.18    (d) A copy of the signed, written collaborative agreement 19must be available to the Department upon request from both the 20naturopathic doctor and the collaborating physician.21    (e) A naturopathic doctor shall inform each collaborating 22physician of all written collaborative agreements he or she 23has signed and provide a copy of these to any collaborating 24physician upon request.25    (f) A collaborating physician may, but is not required to, 26delegate prescriptive authority to a naturopathic doctor as   HB3450- 12 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1part of a written collaborative agreement. This authority may, 2but is not required to, include prescription of, selection of, 3orders for, administration of, storage of, acceptance of 4samples of, and dispensing medical devices, over-the-counter 5medications, legend drugs excluding controlled substances, and 6other preparations, including, but not limited to, botanical 7and herbal remedies.8    (g) The collaborating physician shall file with the 9Department notice of delegation of prescriptive authority to a 10naturopathic doctor and termination of delegation, specifying 11the authority delegated or terminated. Nothing in this Act 12shall be construed to limit the delegation of tasks or duties 13by the collaborating physician to a nurse or other 14appropriately trained persons in accordance with Section 54.2 15of the Medical Practice Act of 1987.16    (h) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to limit the 17delegation of tasks or duties by a physician to a licensed 18practical nurse, a registered professional nurse, or other 19persons. Nothing in this Act shall be construed to limit the 20method of delegation that may be authorized by any means, 21including, but not limited to, oral, written, electronic, 22standing orders, protocols, guidelines, or verbal orders. 23Nothing in this Act shall be construed to authorize a 24naturopathic doctor to provide health care services required 25by law or rule to be performed by a physician. Nothing in this 26Act shall be construed to authorize the delegation or   HB3450- 13 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1performance of operative surgery. 2    Section 35. Written collaborative agreement; temporary 3practice. Any naturopathic doctor required to enter into a 4written collaborative agreement with a collaborating physician 5is authorized to continue to practice for up to 90 days after 6the termination of a written collaborative agreement provided 7the naturopathic doctor seeks any necessary collaboration at a 8local hospital and refers patients who require services beyond 9the training and experience of the naturopathic doctor to a 10physician or other health care provider. 11    Section 40. Written collaborative agreement exemptions. A 12naturopathic doctor shall be exempt from a written 13collaborative agreement and granted full practice authority if 14the naturopathic doctor meets either of the following:15        (1) possesses a minimum of 2 years practicing in a 16state with prescriptive authority; or17        (2) has completed an internship or residency that had 18a duration of at least one year. 19    Section 45. Full practice authority. 20    (a) A naturopathic doctor shall be deemed by law to 21possess the ability to practice without a written 22collaborative agreement if the naturopathic doctor files with 23the Department a notarized attestation of completion of at   HB3450- 14 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1least 100 hours of continuing education or training and at 2least 2,000 hours of clinical experience. Documentation of 3successful completion of the continuing education hours shall 4be provided to the Department upon request. Completion of the 5clinical experience must be attested to by the collaborating 6physician or physicians or employer and the naturopathic 7doctor. If the collaborating physician or physicians or 8employer is unable to attest to the completion of the clinical 9experience, the Department may accept other evidence of 10clinical experience as established by rule.11    (b) The scope of practice of a naturopathic doctor with 12full practice authority includes the following:13        (1) all matters included in Section 50;14        (2) practicing without a written collaborative 15    agreement in all practice settings;16        (3) authority to prescribe legend drugs, excluding 17    controlled substances, over-the-counter medications, and 18    other preparations, including, but not limited to, 19    botanical and herbal remedies; and20        (4) use of only local anesthetic.21    The scope of practice of a naturopathic doctor does not 22include operative surgery.23    (c) The Department may adopt rules necessary to administer 24this Section, including, but not limited to, requiring the 25completion of forms and the payment of fees.26    (d) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to authorize a   HB3450- 15 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1naturopathic doctor with full practice authority to provide 2health care services required by law or rule to be performed by 3a physician. 4    Section 50. Scope of practice. A licensee may practice 5naturopathic medicine to provide primary care in alignment 6with naturopathic medical education to: 7        (1) perform physical examinations; 8        (2) order laboratory examinations; 9        (3) order diagnostic imaging studies; 10        (4) interpret the results of laboratory examinations 11    for diagnostic purposes; 12        (5) order and, based on a radiologist's report, take 13    action on diagnostic imaging studies in a manner 14    consistent with naturopathic training; 15        (6) prescribe, administer, dispense, and order food, 16    extracts of food, nutraceuticals, vitamins, amino acids, 17    minerals, enzymes, botanicals and their extracts, 18    botanical medicines, homeopathic medicines, dietary 19    supplements, and nonprescription drugs as defined by the 20    Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act; 21        (7) use routes of administration that include oral, 22    nasal, auricular, subcutaneous, intravenous, transdermal, 23    and intramuscular routes of administration, consistent 24    with the education and training of a naturopathic doctor; 25        (8) perform naturopathic physical medicine;   HB3450- 16 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1        (9) employ the use of naturopathic therapy; 2        (10) use therapeutic devices, barrier contraception, 3    hormonal and pharmaceutical contraception, and durable 4    medical equipment; or  5    Section 55. Referral requirement. If a patient's medical 6condition is determined, at the time of evaluation or 7treatment, to be beyond the scope of practice of a licensee, 8then the licensee must refer the patient to a physician 9licensed to practice medicine in all of its branches under the 10Medical Practice Act of 1987 or an advanced practice 11registered nurse licensed under the Nurse Practice Act. 12    Section 56. Prohibitions. A licensee shall not: 13        (1) perform major surgery;14        (2) use general or spinal anesthetics; 15        (3) administer ionizing radioactive substances for 16    therapeutic purposes; 17        (4) perform a surgical procedure using a laser device; 18        (5) perform a surgical procedure involving any of the 19    following areas of the body that extend beyond superficial 20    tissue: 21            (A) eyes; 22            (B) ears; 23            (C) tendons; 24            (D) nerves;   HB3450- 17 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1            (E) veins; or 2            (F) arteries; 3        (6) perform a surgical abortion; 4        (7) treat any lesion suspected of malignancy or 5    requiring surgical removal; or 6        (8) perform acupuncture.  7    Section 70. Exemptions. Nothing in this Act shall be 8construed to prohibit or to restrict: 9        (1) the practice of a health care profession by an 10    individual who is licensed, certified, or registered under 11    other laws of this State and who is performing services 12    within the individual's authorized scope of practice; 13        (2) the practice of naturopathic medicine by a student 14    enrolled in an approved naturopathic medical educational 15    program if the practice of naturopathic medicine by a 16    student is performed pursuant to a course of instruction 17    or an assignment from an instructor at an accredited 18    university or college by an instructor duly licensed as a 19    health care provider in this State; 20        (3) any person who sells a vitamin or herb from 21    providing information about the vitamin or herb; 22        (4) the practice of naturopathic medicine by persons 23    who are licensed to practice in any other state or 24    district in the United States and who enter this State to 25    consult with a naturopathic doctor of this State if the   HB3450- 18 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1    consultation is limited to an examination or 2    recommendation; or 3        (5) any person or practitioner who is not licensed as 4    a naturopathic doctor from recommending ayurvedic 5    medicine, herbal remedies, nutritional advice, homeopathy, 6    or other therapy that is within the scope of practice of 7    naturopathic medicine; however, the person or practitioner 8    shall not: 9            (A) use a title protected pursuant to Section 75; 10            (B) represent or assume the character or 11        appearance of a licensee; or 12            (C) otherwise use a name, title, or other 13        designation that indicates or implies that the person 14        is a licensee.  15    Section 75. Protected titles. 16    (a) A licensee shall use the title "naturopathic doctor" 17and the recognized abbreviation "N.D.". 18    (b) A licensee has the exclusive right to use the 19following terms in reference to the licensee's self: 20        (1) "naturopathic doctor"; 21        (2) "doctor of naturopathic medicine"; 22        (3) "doctor of naturopathy"; 23        (4) "naturopath"; 24        (5) "N.D."; and25        (6) "ND".   HB3450- 19 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1    (c) An individual represents the individual's self to be a 2naturopathic doctor when the individual uses or adopts any of 3the following terms in reference to the individual's self: 4        (1) "naturopathic doctor"; 5        (2) "doctor of naturopathic medicine"; 6        (3) "doctor of naturopathy"; 7        (4) "naturopath"; 8        (5) "N.D."; or9        (6) "ND".10    (d) An individual shall not represent the individual's 11self to the public as a naturopathic doctor, a doctor of 12naturopathic medicine, a doctor of naturopathy, a naturopath, 13a naturopathic medical doctor, a naturopathic physician, or as 14being otherwise authorized to practice naturopathic medicine 15in this State, unless the individual is a licensee.  16    Section 80. Naturopathic Medical Board. 17    (a) The Naturopathic Medical Board shall oversee: 18        (1) licensure of naturopathic doctors; and 19        (2) matters relating to training and licensure of 20    naturopathic doctors. 21    (b) Within 180 days after the effective date of this Act, 22the Governor shall appoint an initial Board consisting of 2 23members for terms of 4 years each, 3 members for terms of 3 24years each, and 4 members for terms of 2 years each. The 25initial Board shall consist of the following voting members:   HB3450- 20 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1        (1) 5 licensed naturopathic doctors who are residents 2    of this State; 3        (2) 2 practicing physicians licensed to practice 4    medicine in all of its branches; and 5        (3) 2 public members who are residents of this State, 6    who are not, and never have been, a licensed health care 7    practitioner, and who do not have an interest in 8    naturopathic education, naturopathic medicine, or 9    naturopathic business or practice. 10    Members of the Board may be recommended to the Governor by 11the Illinois Association of Naturopathic Physicians.12    (c) As the terms of the initial Board members expire, the 13Governor shall appoint successors for terms of 4 years each as 14follows: 15        (1) 5 naturopathic doctors licensed pursuant to this 16    Act; 17        (2) 2 practicing physicians licensed to practice 18    medicine in all of its branches with experience working 19    with naturopathic doctors; and 20        (3) 2 public members that are residents of this State 21    who are not, and never have been, a licensed health care 22    practitioner and who do not have an interest in 23    naturopathic education, naturopathic medicine, or 24    naturopathic business or practice. 25    (d) Within 30 days after the Board is established, the 26Board shall call the first meeting, at which meeting members   HB3450- 21 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1shall elect a chair. The Board may hold meetings at the call of 2the chair or at the written request of any 2 members of the 3Board. 4    (e) Vacancies on the Board shall be filled from a list of 5not fewer than 3 candidates. 6    (f) A majority of the Board shall constitute a quorum. 7    (g) Members of the Board shall serve without compensation 8but may, at the discretion of the Board, be reimbursed for 9their expenses incurred in performing their duties.10    (h) The Department of Financial and Professional 11Regulation shall provide administrative and other support to 12the Board. 13    Section 85. Board duties. The Board shall have the 14following duties: 15        (1) regulating the licensure of naturopathic doctors 16    and determining the hours of continuing education units 17    required for maintaining licensure as a naturopathic 18    doctor;19        (2) prescribing the manner in which records of 20    examinations and treatments shall be kept and maintained; 21        (3) establishing standards for professional 22    responsibility and conduct; 23        (4) identifying disciplinary actions and circumstances 24    that require disciplinary action; 25        (5) developing a means to provide information to all   HB3450- 22 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1    licensees in this State; 2        (6) providing for the investigation of complaints 3    against licensees or persons holding themselves out as 4    naturopathic doctors in this State; 5        (7) providing for the publication of information for 6    the public about licensees and the practice of 7    naturopathic medicine in this State; 8        (8) providing for an orderly process for reinstatement 9    of a license; 10        (9) establishing criteria for advertising or 11    promotional materials; 12        (10) establishing procedures and standards for 13    reviewing licensing examination scores;14        (11) establishing procedures for reviewing transcripts 15    demonstrating completion of the approved naturopathic 16    medical educational program; 17        (12) establishing and maintaining a list of 18    naturopathic medical education programs that meet the 19    requirements of Section 20; 20        (13) establishing the requirements for issuance and 21    renewal of licenses;22        (14) creating and conducting the jurisprudence 23    examination; and24        (15) any other matter necessary to implement this Act. 25    Section 90. License expiration, renewal, denial,   HB3450- 23 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1revocation, and continuing education. 2    (a) A license issued or renewed pursuant to this Act shall 3expire in a time frame determined by rule by the Department. 4    (b) The Board may renew the license of any licensee who, 5upon the expiration of the licensee's license: 6        (1) has submitted an application for renewal; 7        (2) has paid the renewal fee established by rules of 8    the Department; 9        (3) meets the qualifications for licensure set forth 10    in this Act and rules of the Department; and 11        (4) meets the continuing education requirements 12    established by the Board. 13    (c) If the Board intends to refuse to issue or renew, 14revoke, or suspend a license, the Department shall grant the 15applicant or licensee an opportunity for a hearing.  16    Section 95. Grounds for disciplinary action. 17    (a) The Department may refuse to issue or to renew, or may 18revoke, suspend, place on probation, reprimand, or take other 19disciplinary or nondisciplinary action with regard to any 20license issued under this Act as the Department may deem 21proper, including the issuance of fines not to exceed $10,000 22for each violation, for any one or combination of the 23following causes:24        (1) material misstatement in furnishing information to 25    the Department;  HB3450- 24 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1        (2) violations of this Act, or the rules adopted under 2    this Act;3        (3) conviction by plea of guilty or nolo contendere, 4    finding of guilt, jury verdict, or entry of judgment or 5    sentencing, including, but not limited to, convictions, 6    preceding sentences of supervision, conditional discharge, 7    or first offender probation, under the laws of any 8    jurisdiction of the United States that is: (i) a felony; 9    or (ii) a misdemeanor, an essential element of which is 10    dishonesty, or that is directly related to the practice of 11    the profession;12        (4) making any misrepresentation for the purpose of 13    obtaining licenses;14        (5) professional incompetence;15        (6) aiding or assisting another person in violating 16    any provision of this Act or its rules;17        (7) failing, within 60 days, to provide information in 18    response to a written request made by the Department;19        (8) engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or 20    unprofessional conduct, as defined by rule, of a character 21    likely to deceive, defraud, or harm the public. 22        (9) habitual or excessive use or addiction to alcohol, 23    narcotics, stimulants, or any other chemical agent or drug 24    that results in a naturopathic doctor's inability to 25    practice with reasonable judgment, skill, or safety;26        (10) discipline by another U.S. jurisdiction or   HB3450- 25 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1    foreign nation, if at least one of the grounds for 2    discipline is the same or substantially equivalent to 3    those set forth in this Section;4        (11) directly or indirectly giving to or receiving 5    from any person, firm, corporation, partnership, or 6    association any fee, commission, rebate or other form of 7    compensation for any professional services not actually or 8    personally rendered. Nothing in this paragraph (11) 9    affects any bona fide independent contractor or employment 10    arrangements, which may include provisions for 11    compensation, health insurance, pension, or other 12    employment benefits, with persons or entities authorized 13    under this Act for the provision of services within the 14    scope of the licensee's practice under this Act;15        (12) abandonment of a patient;16        (13) willfully making or filing false records or 17    reports in the individual's practice, including, but not 18    limited to, false records filed with State agencies or 19    departments;20        (14) physical illness, or mental illness or impairment 21    that results in the inability to practice the profession 22    with reasonable judgment, skill, or safety, including, but 23    not limited to, deterioration through the aging process or 24    loss of motor skill;25        (15) being named as a perpetrator in an indicated 26    report by the Department of Children and Family Services   HB3450- 26 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1    under the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, and 2    upon proof by clear and convincing evidence that the 3    licensee has caused a child to be an abused child or 4    neglected child as defined in the Abused and Neglected 5    Child Reporting Act;6        (16) gross negligence resulting in permanent injury or 7    death of a patient;8        (17) employment of fraud, deception or any unlawful 9    means in applying for or securing a license under this 10    Act;11        (18) immoral conduct in the commission of any act, 12    such as sexual abuse, sexual misconduct, or sexual 13    exploitation related to the licensee's practice;14        (19) practicing under a false or assumed name, except 15    as provided by law;16        (20) making a false or misleading statement regarding 17    the licensee's skill or the efficacy or value of the 18    treatment or remedy prescribed by the licensee in the 19    course of treatment;20        (21) allowing another person to use the licensee's 21    license to practice;22        (22) prescribing, selling, administering, 23    distributing, giving, or self-administering a drug 24    classified as a controlled substance;25        (23) a pattern of practice or other behavior that 26    demonstrates incapacity or incompetence to practice under   HB3450- 27 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1    this Act;2        (24) violating State or federal laws or regulations 3    relating to controlled substances or other legend drugs or 4    ephedra as defined in the Ephedra Prohibition Act;5        (25) failure to establish and maintain records of 6    patient care and treatment as required by law;7        (26) attempting to subvert or cheat on the required 8    examinations;9        (27) willfully failing to report an instance of 10    suspected abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or 11    self-neglect of an eligible adult as defined in and 12    required by the Adult Protective Services Act;13        (28) being named as an abuser in a verified report by 14    the Department on Aging under the Adult Protective 15    Services Act and upon proof by clear and convincing 16    evidence that the licensee abused, neglected, or 17    financially exploited an eligible adult as defined in the 18    Adult Protective Services Act;19        (29) failure to report to the Department an adverse 20    final action taken against the individual by another 21    licensing jurisdiction of the United States or a foreign 22    state or country, a peer review body, a health care 23    institution, a professional society or association, a 24    governmental agency, a law enforcement agency, or a court 25    acts or conduct similar to acts or conduct that would 26    constitute grounds for action under this Section; and  HB3450- 28 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1        (30) failure to provide copies of records of patient 2    care or treatment, except as required by law.3    (b) The Department may refuse to issue or may suspend 4without hearing, as provided for in the Code of Civil 5Procedure, the license of any person who fails to file a 6return, or pay the tax, penalty, or interest shown in a filed 7return, or pay any final assessment of the tax, penalty, or 8interest as required by any tax Act administered by the 9Illinois Department of Revenue, until the requirements of any 10such tax Act are satisfied in accordance with subsection (g) 11of Section 2105-15 of the Civil Administrative Code of 12Illinois.13    (c) The determination by a circuit court that a licensee 14is subject to involuntary admission or judicial admission as 15provided in the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 16Code operates as an automatic suspension. The suspension will 17end only upon a finding by a court that the patient is no 18longer subject to involuntary admission or judicial admission 19and issues an order so finding and discharging the patient, 20and upon the recommendation of the Board to the Department 21that the licensee be allowed to resume the licensee's 22practice.23    (d) In enforcing this Section, the Department upon a 24showing of a possible violation may compel an individual 25licensed to practice under this Act, or who has applied for 26licensure under this Act, to submit to a mental or physical   HB3450- 29 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1examination, or both, which may include a substance abuse or 2sexual offender evaluation, as required by and at the expense 3of the Department.4    The Department shall specifically designate the examining 5physician licensed to practice medicine in all of its branches 6or, if applicable, the multidisciplinary team involved in 7providing the mental or physical examination or both. The 8multidisciplinary team shall be led by a physician licensed to 9practice medicine in all of its branches and may consist of one 10or more or a combination of physicians licensed to practice 11medicine in all of its branches, licensed clinical 12psychologists, licensed clinical social workers, licensed 13clinical professional counselors, and other professional and 14administrative staff. Any examining physician or member of the 15multidisciplinary team may require any person ordered to 16submit to an examination pursuant to this Section to submit to 17any additional supplemental testing deemed necessary to 18complete any examination or evaluation process, including, but 19not limited to, blood testing, urinalysis, psychological 20testing, or neuropsychological testing.21    The Department may order the examining physician or any 22member of the multidisciplinary team to provide to the 23Department any and all records, including business records, 24that relate to the examination and evaluation, including any 25supplemental testing performed.26    The Department may order the examining physician or any   HB3450- 30 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1member of the multidisciplinary team to present testimony 2concerning the mental or physical examination of the licensee 3or applicant. No information, report, record, or other 4documents in any way related to the examination shall be 5excluded by reason of any common law or statutory privilege 6relating to communications between the licensee or applicant 7and the examining physician or any member of the 8multidisciplinary team. No authorization is necessary from the 9licensee or applicant ordered to undergo an examination for 10the examining physician or any member of the multidisciplinary 11team to provide information, reports, records, or other 12documents or to provide any testimony regarding the 13examination and evaluation.14    The individual to be examined may have, at the 15individual's own expense, another physician of the 16individual's choice present during all aspects of this 17examination. However, that physician shall be present only to 18observe and may not interfere in any way with the examination.19    Failure of an individual to submit to a mental or physical 20examination, when ordered, shall result in an automatic 21suspension of the individual's license until the individual 22submits to the examination.23    If the Department finds an individual unable to practice 24because of the reasons set forth in this Section, the 25Department may require that individual to submit to care, 26counseling, or treatment by physicians approved or designated   HB3450- 31 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1by the Department, as a condition, term, or restriction for 2continued, reinstated, or renewed licensure to practice; or, 3in lieu of care, counseling, or treatment, the Department may 4file a complaint to immediately suspend, revoke, or otherwise 5discipline the license of the individual. An individual whose 6license was granted, continued, reinstated, renewed, 7disciplined, or supervised subject to such terms, conditions, 8or restrictions, and who fails to comply with such terms, 9conditions, or restrictions, shall be referred to the 10Secretary for a determination whether the individual shall 11have his or her license suspended immediately, pending a 12hearing by the Department.13    In instances in which the Department immediately suspends 14a person's license under this Section, a hearing on that 15person's license must be convened by the Department within 30 16days after the suspension and completed without appreciable 17delay. The Department shall have the authority to review the 18subject individual's record of treatment and counseling 19regarding the impairment to the extent permitted by applicable 20federal statutes and regulations safeguarding the 21confidentiality of medical records.22    An individual licensed under this Act and affected under 23this Section shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate 24to the Department that the individual can resume practice in 25compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards under the 26provisions of the individual's license.  HB3450- 32 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1    (e) An individual or organization acting in good faith, 2and not in a willful and wanton manner, in complying with this 3Section by providing a report or other information to the 4Department, by assisting in the investigation or preparation 5of a report or information, by participating in proceedings of 6the Department, or by serving as a member of the Department, 7shall not be subject to criminal prosecution or civil damages 8as a result of such actions.9    (f) Members of the Board and the Department shall be 10indemnified by this State for any actions occurring within the 11scope of services under the Act, done in good faith and not 12willful and wanton in nature. The Attorney General shall 13defend all such actions unless the Attorney General determines 14either that there would be a conflict of interest in such 15representation or that the actions complained of were not in 16good faith or were willful and wanton.17    If the Attorney General declines representation, the 18member has the right to employ counsel of the member's choice, 19whose fees shall be provided by this State, after approval by 20the Attorney General, unless there is a determination by a 21court that the member's actions were not in good faith or were 22willful and wanton.23    The member must notify the Attorney General within 7 days 24after receipt of notice of the initiation of any action 25involving services of the Board. Failure to notify the 26Attorney General constitutes an absolute waiver of the right   HB3450- 33 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1to a defense and indemnification.2    The Attorney General shall determine, within 7 days after 3receiving such notice, whether the Attorney General will 4undertake to represent the member. 5    Section 100. Investigation; notice; hearing. The 6Department may investigate the actions of any applicant or of 7any person or persons holding or claiming to hold a license. 8The Department shall, before suspending, revoking, placing on 9probationary status, or taking any other disciplinary action 10as the Department may deem proper with regard to any license, 11at least 30 days prior to the date set for the hearing, notify 12the licensee in writing of any charges made and the time and 13place for a hearing of the charges before the Department, 14direct the licensee to file the licensee's written answer 15thereto to the Department under oath within 20 days after the 16service on the licensee of such notice and inform the licensee 17that if the licensee fails to file such answer, default will be 18taken against the licensee and the license may be suspended, 19revoked, placed on probationary status, or have other 20disciplinary action, including limiting the scope, nature or 21extent of the licensee's practice, as the Department may deem 22proper taken with regard thereto. Written or electronic notice 23may be served by personal delivery, email, or mail to the 24applicant or licensee at the licensee's address of record or 25email address of record. At the time and place fixed in the   HB3450- 34 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1notice, the Department shall proceed to hear the charges and 2the parties or their counsel shall be accorded ample 3opportunity to present such statements, testimony, evidence, 4and argument as may be pertinent to the charges or to the 5defense thereto. The Department may continue such hearing from 6time to time. In case the applicant or licensee, after 7receiving notice, fails to file an answer, the licensee's 8license may in the discretion of the Secretary, having 9received first the recommendation of the Department, be 10suspended, revoked, placed on probationary status, or the 11Department may take whatever disciplinary action as the 12Department may deem proper, including limiting the scope, 13nature, or extent of such person's practice, without a 14hearing, if the act or acts charged constitute sufficient 15grounds for such action under this Act. 16    Section 105. Record of proceedings. The Department, at its 17expense, shall preserve a record of all proceedings at the 18formal hearing of any case involving the refusal to issue or 19renew a license or discipline a licensee. The notice of 20hearing, complaint, and all other documents in the nature of 21pleadings and written motions filed in the proceedings, the 22transcript of testimony, the report of the Department, and 23orders of the Department shall be the record of such 24proceeding.   HB3450- 35 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1    Section 110. Confidentiality. All information collected by 2the Department in the course of an examination or 3investigation of a licensee or applicant, including, but not 4limited to, any complaint against a licensee filed with the 5Department and information collected to investigate any such 6complaint, shall be maintained for the confidential use of the 7Department and shall not be disclosed. The Department shall 8not disclose the information to anyone other than law 9enforcement officials, regulatory agencies that have an 10appropriate regulatory interest as determined by the 11Department, or a party presenting a lawful subpoena to the 12Department. Information and documents disclosed to a federal, 13State, county, or local law enforcement agency shall not be 14disclosed by the agency for any purpose to any other agency or 15person. A formal complaint filed against a licensee by the 16Department or any order issued by the Department against a 17licensee or applicant shall be a public record, except as 18otherwise prohibited by law. 19    Section 115. Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. The 20Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is expressly adopted and 21incorporated herein as if all of the provisions of that Act 22were included in this Act, except that the provision of 23paragraph (d) of Section 10-65 of the Illinois Administrative 24Procedure Act, which provides that at hearings the licensee or 25person holding a license has the right to show compliance with   HB3450- 36 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1all lawful requirements for retention or continuation of the 2license, is specifically excluded. For the purpose of this 3Act, the notice required under Section 10-25 of the Illinois 4Administrative Procedure Act is deemed sufficient when 5personally served, mailed to the address of record of the 6applicant or licensee, or emailed to the email address of 7record of the applicant or licensee. 8    Section 116. The Medical Practice Act of 1987 is amended 9by changing Section 54.5 as follows: 10    (225 ILCS 60/54.5)11    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)12    Sec. 54.5. Physician delegation of authority to physician 13assistants, advanced practice registered nurses without full 14practice authority, and prescribing psychologists, and 15naturopathic doctors without full practice authority. 16    (a) Physicians licensed to practice medicine in all its 17branches may delegate care and treatment responsibilities to a 18physician assistant under guidelines in accordance with the 19requirements of the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987. 20A physician licensed to practice medicine in all its branches 21may enter into collaborative agreements with no more than 7 22full-time equivalent physician assistants, except in a 23hospital, hospital affiliate, or ambulatory surgical treatment 24center as set forth by Section 7.7 of the Physician Assistant   HB3450- 37 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1Practice Act of 1987 and as provided in subsection (a-5).2    (a-5) A physician licensed to practice medicine in all its 3branches may collaborate with more than 7 physician assistants 4when the services are provided in a federal primary care 5health professional shortage area with a Health Professional 6Shortage Area score greater than or equal to 12, as determined 7by the United States Department of Health and Human Services. 8    The collaborating physician must keep appropriate 9documentation of meeting this exemption and make it available 10to the Department upon request.11    (b) A physician licensed to practice medicine in all its 12branches in active clinical practice may collaborate with an 13advanced practice registered nurse in accordance with the 14requirements of the Nurse Practice Act. Collaboration is for 15the purpose of providing medical consultation, and no 16employment relationship is required. A written collaborative 17agreement shall conform to the requirements of Section 65-35 18of the Nurse Practice Act. The written collaborative agreement 19shall be for services for which the collaborating physician 20can provide adequate collaboration. A written collaborative 21agreement shall be adequate with respect to collaboration with 22advanced practice registered nurses if all of the following 23apply:24        (1) The agreement is written to promote the exercise 25    of professional judgment by the advanced practice 26    registered nurse commensurate with his or her education   HB3450- 38 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1    and experience.2        (2) The advanced practice registered nurse provides 3    services based upon a written collaborative agreement with 4    the collaborating physician, except as set forth in 5    subsection (b-5) of this Section. With respect to labor 6    and delivery, the collaborating physician must provide 7    delivery services in order to participate with a certified 8    nurse midwife.9        (3) Methods of communication are available with the 10    collaborating physician in person or through 11    telecommunications for consultation, collaboration, and 12    referral as needed to address patient care needs.13    (b-5) An anesthesiologist or physician licensed to 14practice medicine in all its branches may collaborate with a 15certified registered nurse anesthetist in accordance with 16Section 65-35 of the Nurse Practice Act for the provision of 17anesthesia services. With respect to the provision of 18anesthesia services, the collaborating anesthesiologist or 19physician shall have training and experience in the delivery 20of anesthesia services consistent with Department rules. 21Collaboration shall be adequate if:22        (1) an anesthesiologist or a physician participates in 23    the joint formulation and joint approval of orders or 24    guidelines and periodically reviews such orders and the 25    services provided patients under such orders; and26        (2) for anesthesia services, the anesthesiologist or   HB3450- 39 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1    physician participates through discussion of and agreement 2    with the anesthesia plan and is physically present and 3    available on the premises during the delivery of 4    anesthesia services for diagnosis, consultation, and 5    treatment of emergency medical conditions. Anesthesia 6    services in a hospital shall be conducted in accordance 7    with Section 10.7 of the Hospital Licensing Act and in an 8    ambulatory surgical treatment center in accordance with 9    Section 6.5 of the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center 10    Act.11    (b-10) The anesthesiologist or operating physician must 12agree with the anesthesia plan prior to the delivery of 13services.14    (c) A physician licensed to practice medicine in all its 15branches in active clinical practice may collaborate with a 16naturopathic doctor in accordance with the requirements of the 17Naturopathic Medical Practice Act. Collaboration shall be for 18the purpose of providing medical consultation and an 19employment relationship shall not be required. A written 20collaborative agreement shall conform to the requirements of 21Section 30 of the Naturopathic Medical Practice Act. The 22written collaborative agreement shall be for services for 23which the collaborating physician can provide adequate 24collaboration. A written collaborative agreement shall be 25adequate with respect to collaboration with naturopathic 26doctors if all of the following apply:  HB3450- 40 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1        (1) The agreement is written to promote the exercise 2    of professional judgment by the naturopathic doctor 3    commensurate with his or her education and experience.4        (2) The naturopathic doctor provides services based 5    upon a written collaborative agreement with the 6    collaborating physician.7        (3) Methods of communication with the collaborating 8    physician are available in person or through 9    telecommunications for consultation, collaboration, and 10    referral as needed to address patient care needs. 11    (d) (c) The collaborating physician shall have access to 12the medical records of all patients attended to by a physician 13assistant. The collaborating physician shall have access to 14the medical records of all patients attended to by an advanced 15practice registered nurse. The collaborating physician shall 16have access to the medical records of all patients attended to 17by a naturopathic doctor.18    (d) (Blank).19    (e) A physician shall not be liable for the acts or 20omissions of a prescribing psychologist, physician assistant, 21or advanced practice registered nurse, or naturopathic doctor 22solely on the basis of having signed a supervision agreement 23or guidelines or a collaborative agreement, an order, a 24standing medical order, a standing delegation order, or other 25order or guideline authorizing a prescribing psychologist, 26physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse, or   HB3450- 41 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1naturopathic doctor to perform acts, unless the physician has 2reason to believe the prescribing psychologist, physician 3assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse, or 4naturopathic doctor lacked the competency to perform the act 5or acts or commits willful and wanton misconduct.6    (f) A collaborating physician may, but is not required to, 7delegate prescriptive authority to an advanced practice 8registered nurse as part of a written collaborative agreement, 9and the delegation of prescriptive authority shall conform to 10the requirements of Section 65-40 of the Nurse Practice Act. 11    (g) A collaborating physician may, but is not required to, 12delegate prescriptive authority to a physician assistant as 13part of a written collaborative agreement, and the delegation 14of prescriptive authority shall conform to the requirements of 15Section 7.5 of the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987. 16    (h) (Blank).17    (i) A collaborating physician shall delegate prescriptive 18authority to a prescribing psychologist as part of a written 19collaborative agreement, and the delegation of prescriptive 20authority shall conform to the requirements of Section 4.3 of 21the Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act. 22    (j) As set forth in Section 22.2 of this Act, a licensee 23under this Act may not directly or indirectly divide, share, 24or split any professional fee or other form of compensation 25for professional services with anyone in exchange for a 26referral or otherwise, other than as provided in Section 22.2.   HB3450- 42 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1    (k) A collaborating physician may, but is not required to, 2delegate prescriptive authority to a naturopathic doctor as 3part of a written collaborative agreement, and the delegation 4of prescriptive authority shall conform to the requirements of 5Section 30 of the Naturopathic Medical Practice Act. 6(Source: P.A. 103-228, eff. 1-1-24.) 7    Section 120. The Illinois Controlled Substances Act is 8amended by changing Section 102 as follows: 9    (720 ILCS 570/102)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1102)10    Sec. 102. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 11context otherwise requires: 12    (a) "Person with a substance use disorder" means any 13person who has a substance use disorder diagnosis defined as a 14spectrum of persistent and recurring problematic behavior that 15encompasses 10 separate classes of drugs: alcohol; caffeine; 16cannabis; hallucinogens; inhalants; opioids; sedatives, 17hypnotics and anxiolytics; stimulants; and tobacco; and other 18unknown substances leading to clinically significant 19impairment or distress. 20    (b) "Administer" means the direct application of a 21controlled substance, whether by injection, inhalation, 22ingestion, or any other means, to the body of a patient, 23research subject, or animal (as defined by the Humane 24Euthanasia in Animal Shelters Act) by:   HB3450- 43 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1        (1) a practitioner (or, in his or her presence, by his 2    or her authorized agent), 3        (2) the patient or research subject pursuant to an 4    order, or 5        (3) a euthanasia technician as defined by the Humane 6    Euthanasia in Animal Shelters Act. 7    (c) "Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf 8of or at the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, 9dispenser, prescriber, or practitioner. It does not include a 10common or contract carrier, public warehouseman or employee of 11the carrier or warehouseman. 12    (c-1) "Anabolic Steroids" means any drug or hormonal 13substance, chemically and pharmacologically related to 14testosterone (other than estrogens, progestins, 15corticosteroids, and dehydroepiandrosterone), and includes: 16    (i) 3[beta],17-dihydroxy-5a-androstane, 17    (ii) 3[alpha],17[beta]-dihydroxy-5a-androstane, 18    (iii) 5[alpha]-androstan-3,17-dione, 19    (iv) 1-androstenediol (3[beta], 20        17[beta]-dihydroxy-5[alpha]-androst-1-ene), 21    (v) 1-androstenediol (3[alpha], 22        17[beta]-dihydroxy-5[alpha]-androst-1-ene), 23    (vi) 4-androstenediol  24        (3[beta],17[beta]-dihydroxy-androst-4-ene), 25    (vii) 5-androstenediol  26        (3[beta],17[beta]-dihydroxy-androst-5-ene),   HB3450- 44 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1    (viii) 1-androstenedione  2        ([5alpha]-androst-1-en-3,17-dione), 3    (ix) 4-androstenedione  4        (androst-4-en-3,17-dione), 5    (x) 5-androstenedione  6        (androst-5-en-3,17-dione), 7    (xi) bolasterone (7[alpha],17a-dimethyl-17[beta]- 8        hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 9    (xii) boldenone (17[beta]-hydroxyandrost- 10        1,4,-diene-3-one), 11    (xiii) boldione (androsta-1,4- 12        diene-3,17-dione), 13    (xiv) calusterone (7[beta],17[alpha]-dimethyl-17 14        [beta]-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 15    (xv) clostebol (4-chloro-17[beta]- 16        hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 17    (xvi) dehydrochloromethyltestosterone (4-chloro- 18        17[beta]-hydroxy-17[alpha]-methyl- 19        androst-1,4-dien-3-one), 20    (xvii) desoxymethyltestosterone 21    (17[alpha]-methyl-5[alpha] 22        -androst-2-en-17[beta]-ol)(a.k.a., madol), 23    (xviii) [delta]1-dihydrotestosterone (a.k.a.  24        '1-testosterone') (17[beta]-hydroxy- 25        5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one), 26    (xix) 4-dihydrotestosterone (17[beta]-hydroxy-   HB3450- 45 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1        androstan-3-one), 2    (xx) drostanolone (17[beta]-hydroxy-2[alpha]-methyl- 3        5[alpha]-androstan-3-one), 4    (xxi) ethylestrenol (17[alpha]-ethyl-17[beta]- 5        hydroxyestr-4-ene), 6    (xxii) fluoxymesterone (9-fluoro-17[alpha]-methyl- 7        1[beta],17[beta]-dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 8    (xxiii) formebolone (2-formyl-17[alpha]-methyl-11[alpha], 9        17[beta]-dihydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-one), 10    (xxiv) furazabol (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 11        hydroxyandrostano[2,3-c]-furazan), 12    (xxv) 13[beta]-ethyl-17[beta]-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one, 13    (xxvi) 4-hydroxytestosterone (4,17[beta]-dihydroxy- 14        androst-4-en-3-one), 15    (xxvii) 4-hydroxy-19-nortestosterone (4,17[beta]- 16        dihydroxy-estr-4-en-3-one), 17    (xxviii) mestanolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 18        hydroxy-5-androstan-3-one), 19    (xxix) mesterolone (1amethyl-17[beta]-hydroxy- 20        [5a]-androstan-3-one), 21    (xxx) methandienone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 22        hydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-one), 23    (xxxi) methandriol (17[alpha]-methyl-3[beta],17[beta]- 24        dihydroxyandrost-5-ene), 25    (xxxii) methenolone (1-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy- 26        5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one),   HB3450- 46 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1    (xxxiii) 17[alpha]-methyl-3[beta], 17[beta]- 2        dihydroxy-5a-androstane, 3    (xxxiv) 17[alpha]-methyl-3[alpha],17[beta]-dihydroxy 4        -5a-androstane, 5    (xxxv) 17[alpha]-methyl-3[beta],17[beta]- 6        dihydroxyandrost-4-ene), 7    (xxxvi) 17[alpha]-methyl-4-hydroxynandrolone (17[alpha]- 8        methyl-4-hydroxy-17[beta]-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 9    (xxxvii) methyldienolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 10        hydroxyestra-4,9(10)-dien-3-one), 11    (xxxviii) methyltrienolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 12        hydroxyestra-4,9-11-trien-3-one), 13    (xxxix) methyltestosterone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 14        hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 15    (xl) mibolerone (7[alpha],17a-dimethyl-17[beta]- 16        hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 17    (xli) 17[alpha]-methyl-[delta]1-dihydrotestosterone  18        (17b[beta]-hydroxy-17[alpha]-methyl-5[alpha]- 19        androst-1-en-3-one)(a.k.a. '17-[alpha]-methyl- 20        1-testosterone'), 21    (xlii) nandrolone (17[beta]-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 22    (xliii) 19-nor-4-androstenediol (3[beta], 17[beta]- 23        dihydroxyestr-4-ene), 24    (xliv) 19-nor-4-androstenediol (3[alpha], 17[beta]- 25        dihydroxyestr-4-ene), 26    (xlv) 19-nor-5-androstenediol (3[beta], 17[beta]-   HB3450- 47 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1        dihydroxyestr-5-ene), 2    (xlvi) 19-nor-5-androstenediol (3[alpha], 17[beta]- 3        dihydroxyestr-5-ene), 4    (xlvii) 19-nor-4,9(10)-androstadienedione  5        (estra-4,9(10)-diene-3,17-dione), 6    (xlviii) 19-nor-4-androstenedione (estr-4- 7        en-3,17-dione), 8    (xlix) 19-nor-5-androstenedione (estr-5- 9        en-3,17-dione), 10    (l) norbolethone (13[beta], 17a-diethyl-17[beta]- 11        hydroxygon-4-en-3-one), 12    (li) norclostebol (4-chloro-17[beta]- 13        hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 14    (lii) norethandrolone (17[alpha]-ethyl-17[beta]- 15        hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 16    (liii) normethandrolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]- 17        hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one), 18    (liv) oxandrolone (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy- 19        2-oxa-5[alpha]-androstan-3-one), 20    (lv) oxymesterone (17[alpha]-methyl-4,17[beta]- 21        dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one), 22    (lvi) oxymetholone (17[alpha]-methyl-2-hydroxymethylene- 23        17[beta]-hydroxy-(5[alpha]-androstan-3-one), 24    (lvii) stanozolol (17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy- 25        (5[alpha]-androst-2-eno[3,2-c]-pyrazole), 26    (lviii) stenbolone (17[beta]-hydroxy-2-methyl-   HB3450- 48 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1        (5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one), 2    (lix) testolactone (13-hydroxy-3-oxo-13,17- 3        secoandrosta-1,4-dien-17-oic 4        acid lactone), 5    (lx) testosterone (17[beta]-hydroxyandrost- 6        4-en-3-one), 7    (lxi) tetrahydrogestrinone (13[beta], 17[alpha]- 8        diethyl-17[beta]-hydroxygon- 9        4,9,11-trien-3-one), 10    (lxii) trenbolone (17[beta]-hydroxyestr-4,9, 11        11-trien-3-one). 12    Any person who is otherwise lawfully in possession of an 13anabolic steroid, or who otherwise lawfully manufactures, 14distributes, dispenses, delivers, or possesses with intent to 15deliver an anabolic steroid, which anabolic steroid is 16expressly intended for and lawfully allowed to be administered 17through implants to livestock or other nonhuman species, and 18which is approved by the Secretary of Health and Human 19Services for such administration, and which the person intends 20to administer or have administered through such implants, 21shall not be considered to be in unauthorized possession or to 22unlawfully manufacture, distribute, dispense, deliver, or 23possess with intent to deliver such anabolic steroid for 24purposes of this Act. 25    (d) "Administration" means the Drug Enforcement 26Administration, United States Department of Justice, or its   HB3450- 49 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1successor agency. 2    (d-5) "Clinical Director, Prescription Monitoring Program" 3means a Department of Human Services administrative employee 4licensed to either prescribe or dispense controlled substances 5who shall run the clinical aspects of the Department of Human 6Services Prescription Monitoring Program and its Prescription 7Information Library.8    (d-10) "Compounding" means the preparation and mixing of 9components, excluding flavorings, (1) as the result of a 10prescriber's prescription drug order or initiative based on 11the prescriber-patient-pharmacist relationship in the course 12of professional practice or (2) for the purpose of, or 13incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not 14for sale or dispensing. "Compounding" includes the preparation 15of drugs or devices in anticipation of receiving prescription 16drug orders based on routine, regularly observed dispensing 17patterns. Commercially available products may be compounded 18for dispensing to individual patients only if both of the 19following conditions are met: (i) the commercial product is 20not reasonably available from normal distribution channels in 21a timely manner to meet the patient's needs and (ii) the 22prescribing practitioner has requested that the drug be 23compounded. 24    (e) "Control" means to add a drug or other substance, or 25immediate precursor, to a Schedule whether by transfer from 26another Schedule or otherwise.   HB3450- 50 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1    (f) "Controlled Substance" means (i) a drug, substance, 2immediate precursor, or synthetic drug in the Schedules of 3Article II of this Act or (ii) a drug or other substance, or 4immediate precursor, designated as a controlled substance by 5the Department through administrative rule. The term does not 6include distilled spirits, wine, malt beverages, or tobacco, 7as those terms are defined or used in the Liquor Control Act of 81934 and the Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1995. 9    (f-5) "Controlled substance analog" means a substance:10        (1) the chemical structure of which is substantially 11    similar to the chemical structure of a controlled 12    substance in Schedule I or II;13        (2) which has a stimulant, depressant, or 14    hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system that 15    is substantially similar to or greater than the stimulant, 16    depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central 17    nervous system of a controlled substance in Schedule I or 18    II; or19        (3) with respect to a particular person, which such 20    person represents or intends to have a stimulant, 21    depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central 22    nervous system that is substantially similar to or greater 23    than the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect 24    on the central nervous system of a controlled substance in 25    Schedule I or II. 26    (g) "Counterfeit substance" means a controlled substance,   HB3450- 51 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1which, or the container or labeling of which, without 2authorization bears the trademark, trade name, or other 3identifying mark, imprint, number or device, or any likeness 4thereof, of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser other 5than the person who in fact manufactured, distributed, or 6dispensed the substance. 7    (h) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive 8or attempted transfer of possession of a controlled substance, 9with or without consideration, whether or not there is an 10agency relationship. "Deliver" or "delivery" does not include 11the donation of drugs to the extent permitted under the 12Illinois Drug Reuse Opportunity Program Act. 13    (i) "Department" means the Illinois Department of Human 14Services (as successor to the Department of Alcoholism and 15Substance Abuse) or its successor agency. 16    (j) (Blank). 17    (k) "Department of Corrections" means the Department of 18Corrections of the State of Illinois or its successor agency. 19    (l) "Department of Financial and Professional Regulation" 20means the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation 21of the State of Illinois or its successor agency. 22    (m) "Depressant" means any drug that (i) causes an overall 23depression of central nervous system functions, (ii) causes 24impaired consciousness and awareness, and (iii) can be 25habit-forming or lead to a substance misuse or substance use 26disorder, including, but not limited to, alcohol, cannabis and   HB3450- 52 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1its active principles and their analogs, benzodiazepines and 2their analogs, barbiturates and their analogs, opioids 3(natural and synthetic) and their analogs, and chloral hydrate 4and similar sedative hypnotics. 5    (n) (Blank). 6    (o) "Director" means the Director of the Illinois State 7Police or his or her designated agents. 8    (p) "Dispense" means to deliver a controlled substance to 9an ultimate user or research subject by or pursuant to the 10lawful order of a prescriber, including the prescribing, 11administering, packaging, labeling, or compounding necessary 12to prepare the substance for that delivery. 13    (q) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses. 14    (r) "Distribute" means to deliver, other than by 15administering or dispensing, a controlled substance. 16    (s) "Distributor" means a person who distributes. 17    (t) "Drug" means (1) substances recognized as drugs in the 18official United States Pharmacopoeia, Official Homeopathic 19Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official National 20Formulary, or any supplement to any of them; (2) substances 21intended for use in diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or 22prevention of disease in man or animals; (3) substances (other 23than food) intended to affect the structure of any function of 24the body of man or animals and (4) substances intended for use 25as a component of any article specified in clause (1), (2), or 26(3) of this subsection. It does not include devices or their   HB3450- 53 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1components, parts, or accessories. 2    (t-3) "Electronic health record" or "EHR" means an 3electronic record of health-related information on an 4individual that is created, gathered, managed, and consulted 5by authorized health care clinicians and staff. 6    (t-3.5) "Electronic health record system" or "EHR system" 7means any computer-based system or combination of federally 8certified Health IT Modules (defined at 42 CFR 170.102 or its 9successor) used as a repository for electronic health records 10and accessed or updated by a prescriber or authorized 11surrogate in the ordinary course of his or her medical 12practice. For purposes of connecting to the Prescription 13Information Library maintained by the Bureau of Pharmacy and 14Clinical Support Systems or its successor, an EHR system may 15connect to the Prescription Information Library directly or 16through all or part of a computer program or system that is a 17federally certified Health IT Module maintained by a third 18party and used by the EHR system to secure access to the 19database.20    (t-4) "Emergency medical services personnel" has the 21meaning ascribed to it in the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) 22Systems Act.23    (t-5) "Euthanasia agency" means an entity certified by the 24Department of Financial and Professional Regulation for the 25purpose of animal euthanasia that holds an animal control 26facility license or animal shelter license under the Animal   HB3450- 54 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1Welfare Act. A euthanasia agency is authorized to purchase, 2store, possess, and utilize Schedule II nonnarcotic and 3Schedule III nonnarcotic drugs for the sole purpose of animal 4euthanasia. 5    (t-10) "Euthanasia drugs" means Schedule II or Schedule 6III substances (nonnarcotic controlled substances) that are 7used by a euthanasia agency for the purpose of animal 8euthanasia. 9    (u) "Good faith" means the prescribing or dispensing of a 10controlled substance by a practitioner in the regular course 11of professional treatment to or for any person who is under his 12or her treatment for a pathology or condition other than that 13individual's physical or psychological dependence upon a 14controlled substance, except as provided herein: and 15application of the term to a pharmacist shall mean the 16dispensing of a controlled substance pursuant to the 17prescriber's order which in the professional judgment of the 18pharmacist is lawful. The pharmacist shall be guided by 19accepted professional standards, including, but not limited 20to, the following, in making the judgment: 21        (1) lack of consistency of prescriber-patient 22    relationship, 23        (2) frequency of prescriptions for same drug by one 24    prescriber for large numbers of patients, 25        (3) quantities beyond those normally prescribed, 26        (4) unusual dosages (recognizing that there may be   HB3450- 55 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1    clinical circumstances where more or less than the usual 2    dose may be used legitimately), 3        (5) unusual geographic distances between patient, 4    pharmacist and prescriber, 5        (6) consistent prescribing of habit-forming drugs. 6    (u-0.5) "Hallucinogen" means a drug that causes markedly 7altered sensory perception leading to hallucinations of any 8type. 9    (u-1) "Home infusion services" means services provided by 10a pharmacy in compounding solutions for direct administration 11to a patient in a private residence, long-term care facility, 12or hospice setting by means of parenteral, intravenous, 13intramuscular, subcutaneous, or intraspinal infusion. 14    (u-5) "Illinois State Police" means the Illinois State 15Police or its successor agency. 16    (v) "Immediate precursor" means a substance: 17        (1) which the Department has found to be and by rule 18    designated as being a principal compound used, or produced 19    primarily for use, in the manufacture of a controlled 20    substance; 21        (2) which is an immediate chemical intermediary used 22    or likely to be used in the manufacture of such controlled 23    substance; and 24        (3) the control of which is necessary to prevent, 25    curtail or limit the manufacture of such controlled 26    substance.   HB3450- 56 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1    (w) "Instructional activities" means the acts of teaching, 2educating or instructing by practitioners using controlled 3substances within educational facilities approved by the State 4Board of Education or its successor agency. 5    (x) "Local authorities" means a duly organized State, 6County or Municipal peace unit or police force. 7    (y) "Look-alike substance" means a substance, other than a 8controlled substance which (1) by overall dosage unit 9appearance, including shape, color, size, markings or lack 10thereof, taste, consistency, or any other identifying physical 11characteristic of the substance, would lead a reasonable 12person to believe that the substance is a controlled 13substance, or (2) is expressly or impliedly represented to be 14a controlled substance or is distributed under circumstances 15which would lead a reasonable person to believe that the 16substance is a controlled substance. For the purpose of 17determining whether the representations made or the 18circumstances of the distribution would lead a reasonable 19person to believe the substance to be a controlled substance 20under this clause (2) of subsection (y), the court or other 21authority may consider the following factors in addition to 22any other factor that may be relevant: 23        (a) statements made by the owner or person in control 24    of the substance concerning its nature, use or effect; 25        (b) statements made to the buyer or recipient that the 26    substance may be resold for profit;   HB3450- 57 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1        (c) whether the substance is packaged in a manner 2    normally used for the illegal distribution of controlled 3    substances; 4        (d) whether the distribution or attempted distribution 5    included an exchange of or demand for money or other 6    property as consideration, and whether the amount of the 7    consideration was substantially greater than the 8    reasonable retail market value of the substance. 9    Clause (1) of this subsection (y) shall not apply to a 10noncontrolled substance in its finished dosage form that was 11initially introduced into commerce prior to the initial 12introduction into commerce of a controlled substance in its 13finished dosage form which it may substantially resemble. 14    Nothing in this subsection (y) prohibits the dispensing or 15distributing of noncontrolled substances by persons authorized 16to dispense and distribute controlled substances under this 17Act, provided that such action would be deemed to be carried 18out in good faith under subsection (u) if the substances 19involved were controlled substances. 20    Nothing in this subsection (y) or in this Act prohibits 21the manufacture, preparation, propagation, compounding, 22processing, packaging, advertising or distribution of a drug 23or drugs by any person registered pursuant to Section 510 of 24the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 360). 25    (y-1) "Mail-order pharmacy" means a pharmacy that is 26located in a state of the United States that delivers,   HB3450- 58 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1dispenses or distributes, through the United States Postal 2Service or other common carrier, to Illinois residents, any 3substance which requires a prescription. 4    (z) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, 5propagation, compounding, conversion or processing of a 6controlled substance other than methamphetamine, either 7directly or indirectly, by extraction from substances of 8natural origin, or independently by means of chemical 9synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical 10synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the 11substance or labeling of its container, except that this term 12does not include: 13        (1) by an ultimate user, the preparation or 14    compounding of a controlled substance for his or her own 15    use; 16        (2) by a practitioner, or his or her authorized agent 17    under his or her supervision, the preparation, 18    compounding, packaging, or labeling of a controlled 19    substance: 20            (a) as an incident to his or her administering or 21        dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of 22        his or her professional practice; or 23            (b) as an incident to lawful research, teaching or 24        chemical analysis and not for sale; or 25        (3) the packaging, repackaging, or labeling of drugs 26    only to the extent permitted under the Illinois Drug Reuse   HB3450- 59 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1    Opportunity Program Act. 2    (z-1) (Blank). 3    (z-5) "Medication shopping" means the conduct prohibited 4under subsection (a) of Section 314.5 of this Act.5    (z-10) "Mid-level practitioner" means (i) a physician 6assistant who has been delegated authority to prescribe 7through a written delegation of authority by a physician 8licensed to practice medicine in all of its branches, in 9accordance with Section 7.5 of the Physician Assistant 10Practice Act of 1987, (ii) an advanced practice registered 11nurse who has been delegated authority to prescribe through a 12written delegation of authority by a physician licensed to 13practice medicine in all of its branches or by a podiatric 14physician, in accordance with Section 65-40 of the Nurse 15Practice Act, (iii) an advanced practice registered nurse 16certified as a nurse practitioner, nurse midwife, or clinical 17nurse specialist who has been granted authority to prescribe 18by a hospital affiliate in accordance with Section 65-45 of 19the Nurse Practice Act, (iv) an animal euthanasia agency, or 20(v) a prescribing psychologist. 21    (aa) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether 22produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances 23of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical 24synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical 25synthesis: 26        (1) opium, opiates, derivatives of opium and opiates,   HB3450- 60 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1    including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts 2    of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of 3    such isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within 4    the specific chemical designation; however the term 5    "narcotic drug" does not include the isoquinoline 6    alkaloids of opium; 7        (2) (blank); 8        (3) opium poppy and poppy straw; 9        (4) coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of 10    coca leaves from which substantially all of the cocaine 11    and ecgonine, and their isomers, derivatives and salts, 12    have been removed; 13        (5) cocaine, its salts, optical and geometric isomers, 14    and salts of isomers;15        (6) ecgonine, its derivatives, their salts, isomers, 16    and salts of isomers;17        (7) any compound, mixture, or preparation which 18    contains any quantity of any of the substances referred to 19    in subparagraphs (1) through (6). 20    (bb) "Nurse" means a registered nurse licensed under the 21Nurse Practice Act. 22    (cc) (Blank). 23    (dd) "Opiate" means a drug derived from or related to 24opium. 25    (ee) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver 26somniferum L., except its seeds.   HB3450- 61 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1    (ee-5) "Oral dosage" means a tablet, capsule, elixir, or 2solution or other liquid form of medication intended for 3administration by mouth, but the term does not include a form 4of medication intended for buccal, sublingual, or transmucosal 5administration. 6    (ff) "Parole and Pardon Board" means the Parole and Pardon 7Board of the State of Illinois or its successor agency. 8    (gg) "Person" means any individual, corporation, 9mail-order pharmacy, government or governmental subdivision or 10agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership or 11association, or any other entity. 12    (hh) "Pharmacist" means any person who holds a license or 13certificate of registration as a registered pharmacist, a 14local registered pharmacist or a registered assistant 15pharmacist under the Pharmacy Practice Act. 16    (ii) "Pharmacy" means any store, ship or other place in 17which pharmacy is authorized to be practiced under the 18Pharmacy Practice Act. 19    (ii-5) "Pharmacy shopping" means the conduct prohibited 20under subsection (b) of Section 314.5 of this Act.21    (ii-10) "Physician" (except when the context otherwise 22requires) means a person licensed to practice medicine in all 23of its branches. 24    (jj) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of 25the opium poppy, after mowing. 26    (kk) "Practitioner" means a physician licensed to practice   HB3450- 62 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1medicine in all its branches, dentist, optometrist, podiatric 2physician, veterinarian, scientific investigator, pharmacist, 3physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, 4licensed practical nurse, registered nurse, emergency medical 5services personnel, hospital, laboratory, or pharmacy, or 6other person licensed, registered, or otherwise lawfully 7permitted by the United States or this State to distribute, 8dispense, conduct research with respect to, administer or use 9in teaching or chemical analysis, a controlled substance in 10the course of professional practice or research. 11    (ll) "Pre-printed prescription" means a written 12prescription upon which the designated drug has been indicated 13prior to the time of issuance; the term does not mean a written 14prescription that is individually generated by machine or 15computer in the prescriber's office. 16    (mm) "Prescriber" means a physician licensed to practice 17medicine in all its branches, dentist, optometrist, 18prescribing psychologist licensed under Section 4.2 of the 19Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act with prescriptive 20authority delegated under Section 4.3 of the Clinical 21Psychologist Licensing Act, podiatric physician, or 22veterinarian who issues a prescription, a physician assistant 23who issues a prescription for a controlled substance in 24accordance with Section 303.05, a written delegation, and a 25written collaborative agreement required under Section 7.5 of 26the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987, an advanced   HB3450- 63 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1practice registered nurse with prescriptive authority 2delegated under Section 65-40 of the Nurse Practice Act and in 3accordance with Section 303.05, a written delegation, and a 4written collaborative agreement under Section 65-35 of the 5Nurse Practice Act, an advanced practice registered nurse 6certified as a nurse practitioner, nurse midwife, or clinical 7nurse specialist who has been granted authority to prescribe 8by a hospital affiliate in accordance with Section 65-45 of 9the Nurse Practice Act and in accordance with Section 303.05, 10or an advanced practice registered nurse certified as a nurse 11practitioner, nurse midwife, or clinical nurse specialist who 12has full practice authority pursuant to Section 65-43 of the 13Nurse Practice Act, or a naturopathic doctor with prescriptive 14authority delegated under Section 30 of the Naturopathic 15Medical Practice Act or who has full practice authority 16pursuant to Section 40 or Section 45 of the Naturopathic 17Medical Practice Act. 18    (nn) "Prescription" means a written, facsimile, or oral 19order, or an electronic order that complies with applicable 20federal requirements, of a physician licensed to practice 21medicine in all its branches, dentist, podiatric physician or 22veterinarian for any controlled substance, of an optometrist 23in accordance with Section 15.1 of the Illinois Optometric 24Practice Act of 1987, of a prescribing psychologist licensed 25under Section 4.2 of the Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act 26with prescriptive authority delegated under Section 4.3 of the   HB3450- 64 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act, of a physician assistant 2for a controlled substance in accordance with Section 303.05, 3a written delegation, and a written collaborative agreement 4required under Section 7.5 of the Physician Assistant Practice 5Act of 1987, of an advanced practice registered nurse with 6prescriptive authority delegated under Section 65-40 of the 7Nurse Practice Act who issues a prescription for a controlled 8substance in accordance with Section 303.05, a written 9delegation, and a written collaborative agreement under 10Section 65-35 of the Nurse Practice Act, of an advanced 11practice registered nurse certified as a nurse practitioner, 12nurse midwife, or clinical nurse specialist who has been 13granted authority to prescribe by a hospital affiliate in 14accordance with Section 65-45 of the Nurse Practice Act and in 15accordance with Section 303.05 when required by law, or of an 16advanced practice registered nurse certified as a nurse 17practitioner, nurse midwife, or clinical nurse specialist who 18has full practice authority pursuant to Section 65-43 of the 19Nurse Practice Act, or of a naturopathic doctor with 20prescriptive authority delegated under Section 30 of the 21Naturopathic Medical Practice Act or who has full practice 22authority pursuant to Section 40 or Section 45 of the 23Naturopathic Medical Practice Act. 24    (nn-5) "Prescription Information Library" (PIL) means an 25electronic library that contains reported controlled substance 26data.  HB3450- 65 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1    (nn-10) "Prescription Monitoring Program" (PMP) means the 2entity that collects, tracks, and stores reported data on 3controlled substances and select drugs pursuant to Section 4316. 5    (oo) "Production" or "produce" means manufacture, 6planting, cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled 7substance other than methamphetamine. 8    (pp) "Registrant" means every person who is required to 9register under Section 302 of this Act. 10    (qq) "Registry number" means the number assigned to each 11person authorized to handle controlled substances under the 12laws of the United States and of this State. 13    (qq-5) "Secretary" means, as the context requires, either 14the Secretary of the Department or the Secretary of the 15Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, and the 16Secretary's designated agents. 17    (rr) "State" includes the State of Illinois and any state, 18district, commonwealth, territory, insular possession thereof, 19and any area subject to the legal authority of the United 20States of America. 21    (rr-5) "Stimulant" means any drug that (i) causes an 22overall excitation of central nervous system functions, (ii) 23causes impaired consciousness and awareness, and (iii) can be 24habit-forming or lead to a substance use disorder, including, 25but not limited to, amphetamines and their analogs, 26methylphenidate and its analogs, cocaine, and phencyclidine   HB3450- 66 -LRB104 10056 AAS 20127 b1and its analogs. 2    (rr-10) "Synthetic drug" includes, but is not limited to, 3any synthetic cannabinoids or piperazines or any synthetic 4cathinones as provided for in Schedule I. 5    (ss) "Ultimate user" means a person who lawfully possesses 6a controlled substance for his or her own use or for the use of 7a member of his or her household or for administering to an 8animal owned by him or her or by a member of his or her 9household. 10(Source: P.A. 102-389, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 11102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-881, eff. 1-1-25.) 12    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.